Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,102
Highway Allocation Fund; street intersection, defined.

As used in sections 66-4,101 and 66-4,102, street intersection shall include geometric design elements extending beyond the intersection of two streets to include construction involving curvature for turning movements, turning roadways, deceleration and acceleration lanes, median lanes, median openings, design and construction for U-turns, sight distances, and channelization, together with necessary traffic controls, including such construction as is necessary for traffic both entering and leaving the actual street intersection.

Laws 1965, c. 392, § 3, p. 1254;

Laws 1972, LB 1065, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-423.02.